src/morphology/stems/numeral.lexc
LEXICON NUM_51seitsemänkvadriljardia

+Pl+Abe:ittäkvadriljardeitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltäkvadriljardeilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illäkvadriljardeilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illekvadriljardeille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inekvadriljardeine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istäkvadriljardeista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inäkvadriljardeina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ienkvadriljardien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iinkvadriljardeihin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issäkvadriljardeissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:inkvadriljardein  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ätkvadriljardit  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:iäkvadriljardeja  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksikvadriljardeiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ättäkvadriljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ältäkvadriljardilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:älläkvadriljardilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:ällekvadriljardille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:ästäkvadriljardista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:änäkvadriljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:änkvadriljardin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:äänkvadriljardiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ässäkvadriljardissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:änkvadriljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ääkvadriljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksikvadriljardiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51seitsemänkvadriljoonaa

+Pl+Abe:ittäkvadriljoonitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltäkvadriljoonilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illäkvadriljoonilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illekvadriljoonille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inekvadriljoonine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istäkvadriljoonista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inäkvadriljoonina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ienkvadriljoonien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iinkvadriljooniin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issäkvadriljoonissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:inkvadriljoonin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ätkvadriljoonat  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:iäkvadriljoonia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksikvadriljooniksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ättäkvadriljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ältäkvadriljoonalta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:älläkvadriljoonalla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:ällekvadriljoonalle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:ästäkvadriljoonasta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:änäkvadriljoonana  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:änkvadriljoonan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:äänkvadriljoonaan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ässäkvadriljoonassa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:änkvadriljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ääkvadriljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksikvadriljoonaksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51seitsemänkvintiljardia

+Pl+Abe:ittäkvintiljardeitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltäkvintiljardeilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illäkvintiljardeilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illekvintiljardeille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inekvintiljardeine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istäkvintiljardeista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inäkvintiljardeina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ienkvintiljardien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iinkvintiljardeihin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issäkvintiljardeissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:inkvintiljardein  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ätkvintiljardit  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:iäkvintiljardeja  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksikvintiljardeiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ättäkvintiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ältäkvintiljardilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:älläkvintiljardilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:ällekvintiljardille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:ästäkvintiljardista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:änäkvintiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:änkvintiljardin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:äänkvintiljardiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ässäkvintiljardissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:änkvintiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ääkvintiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksikvintiljardiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51seitsemänkvintiljoonaa

+Pl+Abe:ittäkvintiljoonitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltäkvintiljoonilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illäkvintiljoonilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illekvintiljoonille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inekvintiljoonine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istäkvintiljoonista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inäkvintiljoonina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ienkvintiljoonien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iinkvintiljooniin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issäkvintiljoonissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:inkvintiljoonin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ätkvintiljoonat  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:iäkvintiljoonia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksikvintiljooniksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ättäkvintiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ältäkvintiljoonalta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:älläkvintiljoonalla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:ällekvintiljoonalle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:ästäkvintiljoonasta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:änäkvintiljoonana  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:änkvintiljoonan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:äänkvintiljoonaan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ässäkvintiljoonassa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:änkvintiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ääkvintiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksikvintiljoonaksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51seitsemänkymmentä

+Pl+Abe:ittäkymmenittä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltäkymmeniltä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illäkymmenillä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illekymmenille  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inekymmenine  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istäkymmenistä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inäkymmeninä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ienkymmenien  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iinkymmeniin  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issäkymmenissä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:inkymmenin  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ätkymmenet  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:iäkymmeniä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksikymmeniksi  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ättäkymmenettä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ältäkymmeneltä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:älläkymmenellä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:ällekymmenelle  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:ästäkymmenestä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:änäkymmenenä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:änkymmenen  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:äänkymmeneen  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ässäkymmenessä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:änkymmentä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ääkymmentä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksikymmeneksi  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51seitsemänmiljardia

+Pl+Abe:ittämiljardeitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltämiljardeilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illämiljardeilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illemiljardeille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inemiljardeine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istämiljardeista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inämiljardeina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ienmiljardien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iinmiljardeihin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issämiljardeissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:inmiljardein  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ätmiljardit  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:iämiljardeja  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksimiljardeiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ättämiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ältämiljardilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ällämiljardilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:ällemiljardille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:ästämiljardista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:änämiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:änmiljardin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:äänmiljardiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ässämiljardissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:änmiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:äämiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksimiljardiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
seitsemänkvadriljardia+Num:seitsem  NUM_51seitsemänkvadriljardia  ;
seitsemänkvadriljoonaa+Num:seitsem  NUM_51seitsemänkvadriljoonaa  ;
seitsemänkvintiljardia+Num:seitsem  NUM_51seitsemänkvintiljardia  ;
seitsemänkvintiljoonaa+Num:seitsem  NUM_51seitsemänkvintiljoonaa  ;
seitsemänkymmentä+Num:seitsem  NUM_51seitsemänkymmentä  ;
seitsemänmiljardia+Num:seitsem  NUM_51seitsemänmiljardia  ;
